Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Chapter 12. Enforcement of Child Support Orders from Foreign Jurisdictions

§§ 93-12-1 through 93-12-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 131, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§93-12-1. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 1; Laws 1993, ch. 506, § 17]

§93-12-3. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 2; Laws 1989, ch. 371, § 1]

§93-12-5. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 3; Laws 1989, ch. 371, § 2]

§93-12-7. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 4]

§93-12-9. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 5]

§93-12-11. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 6]

§93-12-13. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 7]

§93-12-15. [Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 8]

§ 93-12-17.
Voluntary order for withholding.

Any person who is the obligor in a support order of another jurisdiction may obtain a voluntary order of withholding by filing with the court a request for such withholding and a certified copy of the support order of a sister state. The court shall issue an order for withholding pursuant to Sections 93-12-1 et seq. Payment shall be made to the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 93-12-19.
Application of state laws to actions and proceedings.

The laws of this state shall apply in all actions and proceedings concerning the issuance, enforcement and duration of an order for withholding issued by a court of this state, which is based upon a support order of another jurisdiction entered pursuant to Sections 93-12-1 et seq. The penalties contained in Section 93-11-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply to all orders for withholding issued pursuant to Sections 93-12-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 93-12-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 131, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Laws, 1988, ch. 480, § 13]